Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
ELECTION BY PRE-1968
CORPORATE ENTITIES

7-137-201. Procedure to elect to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title.

Any corporate entity with shares of capital stock formed before January 1, 1968, under article 40, 50, or 51 of this title, any corporate entity formed before January 1, 1968, under article 40 or 50 of this title without shares of capital stock, and any corporate entity whether with or without shares of capital stock and formed before January 1, 1968, under any general law or created by any special act of the general assembly for a purpose for which a nonprofit corporation may be formed under articles 121 to 137 of this title may elect to accept said articles in the following manner:

If there are members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the corporate entity accept articles 121 to 137 of this title and directing that the question of acceptance be submitted to a vote at a meeting of the members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or special meeting. The question shall also be submitted whenever one-twentieth of the members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon so request. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider electing to accept said articles shall be given to each member or stockholder entitled to vote at the meeting within the time and in the manner provided in said articles for the giving of notice of meetings to members or stockholders. Such election to accept said articles shall require for adoption at least two-thirds of the votes that members or stockholders present at such meeting in person or by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title may be made at a meeting of the board of directors pursuant to a majority vote of the directors in office.

In effecting acceptance of articles 121 to 137 of this title, the corporate entity shall follow the requirements of the law under which it was formed, its articles of incorporation, and its bylaws so far as applicable.

If the domestic entity name of the corporate entity accepting articles 121 to 137 of this title is not in conformity with part 6 of article 90 of this title, the corporate entity shall change its domestic entity name to conform with part 6 of article 90 of this title. The adoption of a domestic entity name that is in conformity with said part 6 by the members or stockholders of the corporate entity, and its inclusion in the statement of election to accept articles 121 to 137 as the entity name, shall be the only action necessary to effect the change. The articles of incorporation, affidavit, or other basic organizational charter shall be deemed for all purposes amended to conform to the entity name.

All corporate entities accepting articles 121 to 137 of this title whose articles of incorporation, affidavits of incorporation, or other basic charters, by whatever names denominated, are not on file in the records of the secretary of state as required by section 7-137-102 (2) shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a certified copy of such articles of incorporation, affidavits of incorporation, or other basic charters at the time of delivery of the statement of election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title.

All corporate entities accepting articles 121 to 137 of this title are reporting entities subject to part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports from reporting entities, and are subject to part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 751, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

IP(1) and (1)(d) amended, p. 987, § 101, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2353, § 340, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4) and (5) amended, p. 1516, § 314, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(3) amended, p. 24, § 20, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(5) amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 2001, § 30, effective August 11.

7-137-202. Statement of election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title.

A statement of election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title shall state:

The domestic entity name of the corporate entity;

A statement by the corporate entity that it has elected to accept said articles and that all required reports have been or will be filed and all fees, taxes, and penalties due to the state of Colorado accruing under any law to which the corporate entity heretofore has been subject have been paid;

If there are members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, a statement stating the date of the meeting of such members or stockholders at which the election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title was made, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that such acceptance was authorized by at least two-thirds of the votes that members or stockholders present at such meeting in person or by proxy were entitled to cast;

If there are no members or stockholders entitled to vote thereon, a statement of such fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which election to accept said articles was made, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that such acceptance was authorized by a majority vote of the directors in office;

A statement that the corporate entity followed the requirements of the law under which it was formed, its articles of incorporation, and its bylaws so far as applicable in effecting such acceptance;

Repealed.

A statement that any attached copy of the articles of incorporation, affidavit, or other basic corporate charter of the corporate entity is true and correct;

If the corporate entity has issued shares of stock, a statement of such fact including the number of shares heretofore authorized, the number issued and outstanding, and a statement that all issued and outstanding shares of stock have been delivered to the corporate entity to be canceled upon the acceptance of articles 121 to 137 of this title by the corporate entity becoming effective and that from and after the effective date of said acceptance the authority of the corporate entity to issue shares of stock is terminated; except that this shall not apply to corporate entities formed for the acquisition and distribution of water to their stockholders.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 753, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(e), (1)(f), and (1)(i) amended, p. 2354, § 341, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(f) and (1)(g) repealed, p. 1516, § 315, effective July 1.

7-137-203. Filing statement of election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title.

The statement of election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1859, § 155, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 1724, § 157, effective October 1.

7-137-204. Effect of certificate of acceptance.

Upon the filing by the secretary of state of the statement of election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title, the election of the corporate entity to accept said articles shall become effective.

A corporate entity so electing under articles 121 to 137 of this title or corresponding provision of prior law shall have the same powers and privileges and be subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities as though such corporate entity had been originally formed under said articles and shall also be subject to any duties or obligations expressly imposed upon the corporate entity by a special charter, subject to the following:

If no period of duration is expressly fixed in the articles of incorporation of such corporate entity, its period of duration shall be deemed to be perpetual.

No amendment to the articles of incorporation adopted after such election to accept articles 121 to 137 of this title shall release or terminate any duty or obligation expressly imposed upon any such corporate entity under and by virtue of a special charter or enlarge any right, power, or privilege granted to any such corporate entity under a special charter, except to the extent that such right, power, or privilege might have been included in the articles of incorporation of a corporate entity formed under said articles.

In the case of any corporate entity with issued shares of stock, the holders of such issued shares who surrender them to the corporate entity to be canceled upon the acceptance of said articles by the corporate entity becoming effective shall become members of the corporate entity with one vote for each share of stock so surrendered until such time as the corporate entity by proper corporate action relative to the election, qualification, terms, and voting power of members shall otherwise prescribe.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 754, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(2) and (2)(b) amended, p. 2355, § 342, effective July 1, 2004.